Tennessee statutes. Title 44 Animals And Animal Husbandry
Part 2

Tennessee Livestock Dealer Act

44-10-201. Short title.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the “Tennessee Livestock Dealer Act.”

Acts 1973, ch. 112, § 1; T.C.A., § 44-1910.

44-10-202. Part definitions.

As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Alternative livestock” means non-traditional livestock that are hoofed and captive-farmed for purposes of agricultural or recreational use, as defined by § 70-4-403(3);

“Commissioner” means the commissioner of agriculture or the commissioner's appointed agent;

“Livestock” means cattle, calves, horses, mules, poultry, swine, sheep, goats, and alternative livestock;

“Livestock dealer” means any person who buys, receives or assembles livestock for resale for that person's own account or that of another person more than nine (9) times in any consecutive three-month period;

“Livestock producer” means any person who sells only livestock such person has raised or such person has owned and had in possession for a minimum of sixty (60) days; and

“Person” means an individual, partnership, corporation, association, or other legal entity.

Acts 1973, ch. 112, § 2; T.C.A., § 44-1911; Acts 2004, ch. 526, § 1; 2010, ch. 717, § 2.

Amendments. The 2010 amendment added the definition of “alternative livestock”; rewrote the definition of “livestock” which read: “‘Livestock’ means cattle, equine, swine, sheep, or goats;”; in the definition for “livestock dealer”, substituted “for resale for that person's” for “for resale, either for that person's”, and added “more than nine (9) times in any consecutive three (3) month period” to the end; and substituted “such” for “that that” in two places in the definition of “livestock producer”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2010, ch. 717, § 21. June 30, 2010.

44-10-203. License required — Fee.

Any person doing business as a livestock dealer must procure from the commissioner an annual license. Application for the annual license or its renewal shall be made on forms provided by the commissioner and accompanied by payment of a license fee set by rule pursuant to §43-1-703. Upon a determination that the applicant is qualified, the commissioner shall issue a license to the applicant, and all annual licenses shall terminate and become void on June 30 in the calendar year following issuance of the license or renewal.

Acts 1973, ch. 112, § 3; T.C.A., § 44-1912; 2015, ch. 485, § 21.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment rewrote the section, which read: “Any person doing business as a livestock dealer must secure an annual license from the commissioner. Application for the annual license shall be made on forms provided by the commissioner. A fee of twenty-five dollars ($25.00) shall accompany any such application for initial issuance or renewals. The fees so received are not returnable and shall be kept in a special fund for the administration of this part. Upon a determination that the applicant is qualified, the commissioner shall issue a license to the applicant and all such annual licenses shall terminate and become void each successive June 30.”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2015, ch. 485, § 41. July 1, 2015; May 20, 2015, for the purpose of promulgating rules.

44-10-204. Powers and duties of commissioner.

The commissioner has the power and duty to:

Promulgate such rules and regulations as the commissioner deems necessary to implement and supplement this part and provide for its orderly administration;

Prescribe necessary information to be provided by applicants for licenses to determine if the requirements of this part have been met;

Issue licenses to qualified applicants and collect appropriate fees;

Revoke or suspend the license of, or refuse to issue a license to, any person, licensee, or applicant who violates any provision of this part; and

Require the necessary record keeping by licensees and submission of written reports, as warranted, in order to carry out the provision and intent of this part.

Acts 1973, ch. 112, § 4; T.C.A., § 44-1913.

44-10-205. License revocation or suspension — Hearing — Review.

In the event the commissioner has reason to believe a licensee has violated any of the provisions of this part, including the rules and regulations promulgated under this part, the commissioner shall conduct a hearing, pursuant to the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, part 3, to determine if the license shall be suspended or revoked.

The commissioner has the power to subpoena any persons or record incident to the hearing, and a charge of contumacy may be filed for those who refuse to comply; and the commissioner may administer oaths to those giving evidence. A court reporter shall be in attendance.

Following the hearing, the commissioner may:

Permanently revoke the license;

Temporarily revoke the license; or

Suspend the license for a definite period of time.

The action of the commissioner may be reviewed by common law writ of certiorari to the chancery or circuit court of the county of the licensee who is the subject of the commissioner's action, and the petition shall be filed within ten (10) days from the date of the commissioner's order. Upon the grant of the writ of certiorari, the commissioner shall certify to the court a complete transcript of the proceedings instituted before the commissioner. This certified transcript shall constitute the whole record, and no additional proof or evidence shall be considered by the chancery court of Davidson County.

The decision of the commissioner shall remain final until modified by the commissioner or by the courts.

Acts 1973, ch. 112, § 5; T.C.A., § 44-1914; Acts 2010, ch. 717, § 3.

Compiler's Notes. Subsections (d) and (e) of this section are superseded by §4-5-322(b) to the extent of any conflict or inconsistency between this section and the provisions of §4-5-322(b). See §4-5-103(b).

Amendments. The 2010 amendment in (a), substituted “has violated” for “is guilty of violating”, inserted “, pursuant to the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, part 3”, and deleted the former last sentence which read: “A ten day notice shall be given and the hearing conducted at Ellington Agricultural Center, Nashville.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2010, ch. 717, § 21. June 30, 2010.

44-10-206. Prohibited acts.

The following actions are prohibited:

Any person acting as a livestock dealer without a valid license issued by the commissioner;

Failure to maintain records as required by the commissioner, including the names and addresses of sellers and buyers of livestock;

Failure to provide access to all records required of such licensee by the commissioner;

Buying or selling livestock under an assumed name or address. All livestock sales shall be evidenced by a written bona fide name and address of buyer and seller;

Violation of any valid rule, regulation or statute governing livestock disease control;

Failure to make payment to a buyer or seller, or making such payment with insufficient funds; and

Failure to keep current bond requirements pursuant to 9 C.F.R. § 201, et seq.

Acts 1973, ch. 112, § 6; T.C.A., § 44-1915; Acts 2010, ch. 717, § 4.

Amendments. The 2010 amendment substituted “including” for “especially” in (2), and added (6) and (7).

Effective Dates. Acts 2010, ch. 717, § 21. June 30, 2010.

44-10-207. Exemptions from law.

This part shall not apply to any livestock producer who may occasionally buy or sell livestock in connection with that person's farming operations.

Acts 1973, ch. 112, § 7; T.C.A., § 44-1916; Acts 2010, ch. 717, § 5.

Amendments. The 2010 amendment rewrote this section which read: “This part shall not apply to livestock producers or persons holding a valid license under chapter 11 of this title. Neither shall this part apply to any farmer who may occasionally buy or sell livestock in connection with that person's farming operations and who is not primarily engaged in the business of buying and selling livestock, as determined by the commissioner.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2010, ch. 717, § 21. June 30, 2010.

44-10-208. Penalty for violations.

To operate as a livestock dealer without a valid license, or otherwise violate this part, is a Class A misdemeanor.

Acts 1973, ch. 112, § 8; 1977, ch. 32, § 1; T.C.A., § 44-1917; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113; 2004, ch. 526, § 2.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class A misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

44-10-209. Enjoining violations of law.

The commissioner, on determining that any person may have violated any provision of this part, may petition for injunctive relief from further violation. The petition should be addressed to the chancery court in the county in which the offense occurred or in which the offender's principal place of business is located or where the offender is doing business or resides. The chancellor, on determining that probable cause of a violation of this part exists, shall issue appropriate injunctive relief.

Acts 1973, ch. 112, § 9; T.C.A., § 44-1918.